North Carolina statutes. Chapter 72. Inns, Hotels and Restaurants.
Article 1. Innkeepers.

§ 72-1.
Must furnish accommodations; contracts for termination valid.

Every innkeeper shall at all times provide suitable lodging accommodations for persons accepted as guests in his inn or hotel.

A written statement setting forth the time period during which a guest may occupy an assigned room, signed or initialed by the guest, shall be deemed a valid contract, and at the expiration of such time period the lodger may be restrained from entering and any property of the guest may be removed by the innkeeper without liability, except for damages to or loss of such property attributable to its removal.

History.

1903, c. 563; Rev., s. 1909; C.S., s. 2249; 1979, c. 532.

Cross References.

As to obtaining entertainment at hotels and boardinghouses without paying therefor, see

G.S. 14-110

.

As to possessory liens on personal property, see

G.S. 44A-1

to 44A-6.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “When A Hotel Is Your Home, Is There Protection?,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 295 (1993).

§ 72-2.
Liability for loss of baggage.

Innkeepers shall not be liable for loss, damage or destruction of the baggage or property of their guests except in case such loss, damage, or destruction results from the failure of the innkeeper to exercise ordinary, proper and reasonable care in the custody of such baggage and property; and in case of such loss, damage or destruction resulting from the negligence and want of care of the said innkeeper he shall be liable to the owner of the said baggage and property to an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars. Any guest may, however, at any time before a loss, damage or destruction of his property, notify the innkeeper in writing that his property exceeds in value the said sum of one hundred dollars ($100.00), and shall upon demand of the innkeeper furnish him a list or schedule of the same, with the value thereof, in which case the innkeeper shall be liable for the loss, damage or destruction of said property because of any negligence on his part for the full value of the same. Proof of the loss of any such baggage, except in case of damage or destruction by fire, shall be prima facie evidence of the negligence of said hotel or innkeeper.

History.

1903, c. 563, s. 2; Rev., s. 1910; C.S., s. 2250.

§ 72-3.
Safekeeping of valuables.

It is the duty of innkeepers, upon the request of any guest, to receive from said guest and safely keep money, jewelry and valuables to an amount not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00); and no innkeeper shall be required to receive and take care of any money, jewelry or other valuables to a greater amount than five hundred dollars ($500.00): Provided, the receipt given by said innkeeper to said guest shall have plainly printed upon it a copy of this section. No innkeeper shall be liable for the loss, damage or destruction of any money or jewels not so deposited.

History.

1903, c. 563, s. 3; Rev., s. 1911; C.S., s. 2251.

§ 72-4.
Loss by fire.

No innkeeper shall be liable for loss, damage or destruction of any baggage or property caused by fire not resulting from the negligence of the innkeeper or by any other force over which the innkeeper had no control. Nothing herein contained shall enlarge the limit of the amount to which the innkeeper shall be liable as provided in preceding sections.

History.

1903, c. 563, s. 4; Rev., s. 1912; C.S., s. 2252.

§ 72-5.
Negligence of guest.

Any innkeeper against whom claim is made for loss sustained by a guest may show that such loss resulted from the negligence of such guest or of his failure to comply with the reasonable and proper regulations of the inn.

History.

1903, c. 563, s. 7; Rev., s. 1914; C.S., s. 2253.

Cross References.

As to possessory lien on personal property, see

G.S. 44A-1

to 44A-6.

As to liability for personal injuries and effect of negligence of guest, see note to

G.S. 72-2

.

§ 72-6.
Copies of this Article to be posted.

Every innkeeper shall keep posted in every room of his house occupied by guests, and in the office, a printed copy of this Article and of all regulations relating to the conduct of guests. This Chapter shall not apply to innkeepers, or their guests, where the innkeeper fails to keep such notices posted.

History.

1903, c. 563, ss. 5, 6; Rev., s. 1913; C.S., s. 2254.

§ 72-7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 663, s. 1.

§ 72-7.1.
Admittance of pets to hotel rooms.

Innkeepers may permit pets in rooms used for sleeping purposes and in adjoining rooms. Persons bringing pets into a room in which they are not permitted are in violation of this section and punishable according to subsection (d) of this section.

Innkeepers allowing pets must post a sign measuring not less than five inches by seven inches at the place where guests register informing them pets are permitted in sleeping rooms and in adjoining rooms. If certain pets are permitted or prohibited, the sign must so state. If any pets are permitted, the innkeeper must maintain a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the sleeping rooms in the inn or hotel as rooms where pets are not permitted and the sign required by this subsection must also state that such rooms are available.

All sleeping rooms in which the innkeeper permits pets must contain a sign measuring not less than five inches by seven inches, posted in a prominent place in the room, which shall be separate from the sign required by

G.S. 72-6

, stating that pets are permitted in the room, or whether certain pets are prohibited or permitted in the room, and stating that bringing pets into a room in which they are not permitted is a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

The provisions of this section are not applicable to assistance dogs admitted to sleeping rooms and adjoining rooms under the provisions of Chapter 168 of the General Statutes.

History.

1991, c. 663, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, ss. 544, 545; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, ss. 41, 42; c. 24, s. 14(c).

Cross References.

As to assistance dogs for handicapped persons, see

G.S. 168-4.2

et seq.